Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1)(a) The district attorney of a  county comprising a judicial district with a
population between  150,000 and 300,000 or over 700,000 shall ensure that proceedings before
the grand jury are recorded in the manner described in this  section and section 2 of this 2017
Act.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme  Court shall designate the types of audio electronic
recording devices suitable for recording grand  jury proceedings and may establish policies
and procedures by rule or order to  carry out the provisions of this section and sections 2
and 3 of this 2017 Act.
(c) The district attorney shall use to record the grand  jury proceedings audio electronic
recording devices designated, provided and maintained by the Judicial Department.
(2)(a) The district attorney  shall delegate the recording of grand jury proceedings to a
grand juror and shall  provide instruction to the grand juror concerning the audio electronic
recording equipment and requirements of the recording.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection,  the court may, upon request of the
prosecuting attorney, appoint a certified shorthand reporter as defined in ORS 8.415 or  a
shorthand reporter certified by a national  certification association, who shall be permitted
to attend all proceedings of the grand jury for  the purpose of taking accurate notes. The
shorthand reporter’s services shall be paid for by the prosecuting attorney. The shorthand
reporter shall be sworn  to correctly report the proceedings of the grand jury described in
section 2 of this 2017 Act and to keep secret  any information concerning the grand jury
proceedings.
(c) The grand juror or shorthand reporter  recording the proceedings is not subject to
subpoena, and may not disclose  any information, concerning the grand jury proceedings
without prior court order.
(3)(a) A failure of an audio electronic recording  device to accurately record all or part
of a grand jury proceeding does not affect the validity of any prosecution or indictment.
(b) A failure of a grand juror to operate an audio electronic  recording device in a manner
that accurately records all or part of a grand jury proceeding, as required, does not  affect
the validity of any prosecution or indictment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 1
(c) A failure of a shorthand reporter to prepare accurate notes or an  accurate report of
all or part  of a grand jury proceeding, as required, does not affect the validity of any prose-
cution or indictment.
(4) This section and section 2 of this 2017  Act do not apply to grand jury proceedings
under ORS 132.440 that  inquire into the condition and management of correctional facilities
and youth correction facilities.
SECTION 2. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the grand juror de-
scribed in section 1 (2)(a) of this 2017 Act, or the shorthand reporter described in section  1
(2)(b) of this 2017 Act, who is recording grand jury proceedings in a  judicial district with a
population between 150,000 and 300,000 or over 700,000 shall record all testimony given before
the grand jury, including:
(a) The case name and number;
(b) The name of each witness appearing before the grand jury; and
(c) Each question asked  of, and each response provided by, a witness appearing before
the grand jury.
(2) The grand juror operating  the audio electronic recording device or the shorthand re-
porter may not record:
(a) The deliberations or voting of the grand jury.
(b) A presentment made pursuant to ORS 132.370.
(c) Any statements made by a grand juror who is examined as a  witness as provided in
ORS 132.350.
(d) A procedure related to the production of records, or the  unsealing of records,
subpoenaed pursuant to ORS 136.583 and to be presented before the grand jury.
(3) The district attorney shall maintain the audio recordings, or report of  the shorthand
reporter, produced pursuant to this section and section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 3.
(1) Audio recordings and the  notes or report of a shorthand reporter
produced pursuant to sections 1 and 2  of this 2017 Act in a judicial district with a population
between 150,000 and 300,000 or over 700,000 are confidential and may  not be released except
as described in this section.
(2) When an indictment resulting from grand  jury proceedings is indorsed “a true bill,”
the audio recording or the  notes or report of a shorthand reporter of the grand jury pro-
ceedings may be released only in the following manner:
(a) The prosecuting attorney may access a copy of the audio recording or the notes  or
report of a shorthand reporter at any time.
(b) When the defendant has been arraigned on  the indictment and is represented by an
attorney, the district attorney shall:
(A) Provide a copy to  the defense attorney of all audio recordings, or the notes or report
of a shorthand reporter, related to an indictment after 10 days have passed since  the
defendant’s arraignment on the indictment and no motion described in subsection  (4) of this
section has been filed; or
(B) Provide a copy of the audio recordings, or the notes  or report of a shorthand repor-
ter, to the defense attorney in accordance with the court’s ruling on the motion described
in subsection (4) of this section, if a motion has been filed.
(c) Unless the court orders otherwise for good cause shown, the prosecuting attorney and
the defense attorney may not copy, disseminate or republish the audio recording, the notes
or report of a shorthand reporter, or a transcript prepared  from the audio recording, notes
or report, released  pursuant to this subsection, except to provide a copy to an agent of the
prosecuting attorney or defense attorney for the limited  purpose of case preparation. Unless
a court orders otherwise for  good cause shown, in consulting with the defendant the defense
attorney may not disclose to the defendant:
(A) Any personal identifiers of a victim, witness or grand  juror obtained from the audio
recording, report, notes or transcript; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 2
(B) Any portion of the audio recording, report,  notes or transcript that contains any
personal identifiers of a victim, witness or grand juror.
(d) The defense attorney may not provide a copy of the audio  recording, notes or report,
or a transcript prepared from the audio recording, notes or report, to the defendant.
(e) When the defendant has been arraigned but is not  represented by an attorney, the
defendant may request by motion that the court issue an order allowing the defendant access
to review the contents  of the audio recording or the notes or report of the shorthand re-
porter. A copy of the motion must be provided to the prosecuting attorney.  The prosecuting
attorney may request a hearing on the  motion within 10 days after receiving a copy. At the
hearing, or in response to receiving the motion, the court shall appoint  counsel for the de-
fendant for the limited purpose of  reviewing the audio recording, notes or report and may
set reasonable conditions on the review of the audio recording, notes or report.
(3)(a) When a grand jury inquires into the conduct of a public servant as  defined in ORS
162.005 for acts occurring in the performance of the public servant’s duties, and an
indictment resulting from the grand jury proceedings is indorsed “not a true bill”:
(A) The  public servant or the prosecuting attorney may file a motion requesting a court
order releasing all or a  portion of a transcript of the grand jury proceedings. A copy of the
motion must be served on the opposing party. In deciding whether to issue such an order,
the court shall determine whether the public  interest in disclosure outweighs the interest in
maintaining the secrecy of the grand jury proceedings. If the court orders  disclosure, the
court may set reasonable conditions on copying, disseminating or republishing the transcript.
(B) A member of the public may file  a motion requesting a court order for production
and release of a transcript of the grand jury proceedings. A copy of the motion must  be
served on the prosecuting attorney and the public servant’s attorney, or the public servant
if the public servant is not  represented by an attorney. The person filing the motion is re-
sponsible for the cost of producing the transcript and a  court order for production and re-
lease of the transcript  must be conditioned on receipt of payment. In deciding whether to
issue such an order, the court shall  determine whether the public interest in disclosure
outweighs the interest in maintaining the secrecy of the grand jury proceedings. If the  court
orders disclosure, the court may set reasonable conditions on copying, disseminating or  re-
publishing the transcript.
(b) The release of any transcript under this subsection may not include:
(A) The release of any personal identifiers of a victim or witness; or
(B) The release of the name or any personal identifiers of a grand juror.
(4)(a) A motion  for a protective order concerning an audio recording, the notes or report
of a shorthand reporter or a transcript of grand jury proceedings may be filed as follows:
(A) The prosecuting attorney  may file a motion for a protective order within 10 days af-
ter the defendant’s arraignment on the indictment. The motion  may be filed on behalf of a
victim or  a witness. The prosecuting attorney shall inform the victim of the ability to seek
a protective order.
(B) The prosecuting attorney may file a motion for a protective order  within 10 days af-
ter receiving a motion described in subsection (2)(e) of this section.
(C) The prosecuting attorney, the public servant who is the subject of  an indictment
indorsed “not a true bill” or the public servant’s attorney may file  a motion for a protective
order within 10 days of receiving a motion described in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(b) If the motion for a protective order requests that a portion of the audio recording,
notes, report or transcript be redacted, the motion  must be accompanied by a specific de-
scription, including the date and time, of  the portion of the audio recording, notes, report
or transcript to be redacted.
(c) In response to a motion filed under this  subsection, the court may order that the
access of the person requesting release to a copy of the audio recording, notes, report  or
transcript be denied, restricted or deferred, or may make any other order, upon  a finding
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 3
of substantial and compelling circumstances. In  deciding whether to grant the motion and
enter a protective order under this paragraph, the court may consider the following:
(A) Protection of witnesses and others from physical harm, threats  of harm, bribes,
economic interference, reprisal and other forms of intimidation;
(B) Maintenance of  secrecy regarding informants, as required for effective investigation
of criminal activity;
(C) Confidential information recognized under law, including the  protection of confiden-
tial relationships and privileges and the contents of confidential records unrelated  to a crime
alleged in the indictment; and
(D) Any other relevant considerations.
(d) The court may permit the evidence  of substantial and compelling circumstances de-
scribed in paragraph (c) of this subsection to be made in the form of  a written statement to
be inspected by the court only or by oral testimony given on the record.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, when grand jury proceedings
do not result in an indictment indorsed as either “a true bill” or “not a true bill,” the audio
recording or notes or report of the  shorthand reporter produced pursuant to sections 1 and
2 of this 2017 Act may not be disclosed or released.
(b) When subsequent grand jury proceedings occur inquiring into the  same criminal epi-
sode as the grand jury proceedings described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, and the
subsequent proceedings result in an indictment indorsed as “a  true bill,” the prosecuting
attorney shall provide notice to the person charged in the indictment of the occurrence of
the earlier grand jury proceedings.  After the person is arraigned on the indictment and the
time period described in subsection (2)(b) of this section has passed, the audio recording or
the notes or report of  the shorthand reporter produced during the earlier grand jury pro-
ceedings may be obtained in the manner set forth in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) As used in  this subsection, “criminal episode” has the meaning given that term in
ORS 131.505.
(6) The district attorney of  each county may establish a fee for the cost of providing a
copy of any  audio recording, or the notes or report of a shorthand reporter, of a grand jury
proceeding to a person requesting a copy under this section.
(7) An audio  recording, the notes or report of a shorthand reporter or a transcript of a
grand jury proceeding obtained pursuant to sections 1 and 2  of this 2017 Act and this section:
(a) May not be used as evidence in any subsequent proceeding,  except as permitted under
ORS 40.375, 40.380, 40.450, 40.460 or 40.465.
(b) May not be used to challenge the indorsement of an indictment “a true  bill” or the
proceedings that led to the indorsement.
(c) May be used as evidence in a prosecution for perjury or false swearing committed  by
a witness while giving testimony during the grand jury proceeding or during trial.
(d) May be used as evidence in  a proceeding for contempt of court against a person al-
leged to have violated the terms of  a court order concerning the audio recording, notes, re-
port or transcript.
(e) May be submitted to the court and used as evidence for a hearing  on a protective
order described in subsection (4) of this section.
(8) The release of audio  recordings, shorthand reporter notes or reports or transcripts
of grand jury  proceedings under this section does not affect discovery obligations under ORS
135.805 to 135.873.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) “Personal identifiers” means:
(A) In relation to a  witness or a grand juror, the person’s address, telephone number,
driver license, vehicle registration information, Social  Security number, date of birth and the
identifying number of the person’s depository  account at a financial institution, as defined
in ORS 706.008, or credit card account.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 4
(B) In relation to a victim, the  victim’s address, electronic mail address, telephone
number, driver  license, vehicle registration information, Social Security number, date of
birth, any user names or other identifying information  associated with the victim’s social
media accounts and the identifying  number of the victim’s depository account at a financial
institution, as defined in ORS 706.008, or credit card account.
(b) “Social media” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.330.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 132.090 is amended to read:
132.090. (1) Except as  provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section  and sections 1 and 2
of this 2017 Act , no person  other than the district attorney or a witness actually under examination
shall be present during the sittings of the grand jury.
(2) Upon a motion filed by the district attorney in the circuit court,  the circuit judge may ap-
point a reporter who shall attend the sittings of the grand jury to take and report  the testimony in
any matters pending before the grand jury, and may appoint a parent,  guardian or other appropriate
person 18 years of age or older to accompany any child  12 years of age or younger, or any person
with an intellectual disability, during an appearance before the grand jury.  The circuit judge, upon
the district attorney’s showing to the court that  it is necessary for the proper examination of a
witness appearing  before the grand jury, may appoint a guard, medical or other special attendant
or nurse, who shall be present in the grand jury room and shall attend such sittings.
(3) The district attorney may designate an interpreter who is certified under  ORS 45.291 to in-
terpret the testimony of witnesses appearing before the grand jury. The  district attorney may des-
ignate a qualified interpreter, as defined in ORS 45.288, if the circuit court determines that  a
certified interpreter is not available and that the person designated by the district attorney is  a
qualified interpreter as defined in ORS 45.288. An interpreter designated under this subsection may
be present in the grand jury room and attend the sittings of the grand jury.
(4) No person other than members of the grand jury  shall be present when the grand jury is
deliberating or voting upon a matter before it.
(5) As used in this section, “intellectual disability” has the meaning given  that term in ORS
427.005. Intellectual disability may be shown by attaching to the motion of the district attorney:
(a) Documentary evidence of intellectual functioning; or
(b) The affidavit of a qualified person familiar  with the person with an intellectual disability.
“Qualified person” includes, but is not limited to, a teacher, therapist or physician.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 132.320 is amended to read:
132.320. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to [ (12)] (13)  of this section, in the  investi-
gation of a charge for the  purpose of indictment, the grand jury shall receive no other evidence than
such as might be given on the trial of the person charged with the crime in question.
(2) A report  or a copy of a report made by a physicist, chemist, medical examiner, physician,
firearms identification expert, examiner of questioned documents, fingerprint technician,  or an ex-
pert or technician  in some comparable scientific or professional field, concerning the results of an
examination, comparison or test performed by such person in connection  with a case which is the
subject of a grand  jury proceeding, shall, when certified by such person as a report made by such
person or as a true copy thereof, be received in evidence in the grand jury proceeding.
(3) An affidavit of a witness who is unable to appear before the grand jury shall be received  in
evidence in the grand jury proceeding if, upon application by the district attorney, the  presiding
judge for the judicial district in which the grand  jury is sitting authorizes the receipt after good
cause has been shown for the witness’ inability to appear.  An affidavit taken in another state or
territory of the United States, the District of Columbia or in a foreign  country must be
authenticated as provided in ORS chapter 194 before it can be used in this state.
(4) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of criminal driving while suspended or revoked
under ORS 811.182 may receive in evidence  an affidavit of a peace officer with a report or copy of
a report of the peace officer concerning the peace officer’s investigation of the violation of  ORS
811.182 by the defendant.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 5
(5) A grand  jury may receive testimony of a witness by means of simultaneous television trans-
mission allowing the grand jury and district attorney to observe and communicate with  the witness
and the witness to observe and communicate with the grand jury and the district attorney.
(6) A grand jury  that is investigating a charge of failure to appear under ORS 133.076, 153.992,
162.195 or 162.205 may receive in evidence an affidavit of a court employee certifying that  the de-
fendant failed to appear as required  by law and setting forth facts sufficient to support that con-
clusion.
(7)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a  grand jury may receive in evidence
through the testimony of one peace officer involved in the criminal investigation under grand jury
inquiry information from an official report of another peace officer involved  in the same criminal
investigation concerning the other peace officer’s investigation of the matter before the grand  jury.
The statement of a person suspected of committing an  offense or inadmissible hearsay of persons
other than the peace officer who compiled the official report may not be  presented to a grand jury
under this paragraph.
(b) If the official report contains evidence other than chain of custody,  venue or the name of the
person suspected of  committing an offense, the grand jurors must be notified that the evidence is
being submitted by report and that the peace officer who compiled the report  will be made available
for testimony  at the request of the grand jury. When a grand jury requests the testimony of a peace
officer under this paragraph, the peace officer may present sworn  testimony by telephone if requir-
ing the peace  officer’s presence before the grand jury would constitute an undue hardship on the
peace officer or the agency that employs or utilizes the peace officer.
(8) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of failure to report as a  sex offender under ORS
163A.040 may receive in evidence certified copies of the  form required by ORS 163A.050 (2) and sex
offender registration forms and an affidavit of a representative of the Oregon State  Police, as
keepers of the state’s sex offender registration records, certifying that the certified  copies of the
forms constitute the complete record for the defendant.
(9) The grand jury shall weigh all the evidence submitted to it; and when it believes that other
evidence within its reach will explain  away the charge, it should order such evidence to be
produced, and for that purpose may require the district attorney to issue process for the  witnesses.
(10) A grand jury that  is investigating a charge of driving while under the influence of
intoxicants in violation of  ORS 813.010 may receive in evidence an affidavit of a peace officer re-
garding any or all of the following:
(a) Whether the defendant was driving.
(b) Whether the defendant took or refused to take tests  under any provision of ORS chapter 813.
(c) The administration of tests under any provision  of ORS chapter 813 and the results of such
tests.
(d) The officer’s observations of physical or mental impairment of the defendant.
(11)(a) A grand jury may receive in evidence an  affidavit of a representative of a financial in-
stitution for the purpose of authenticating records of the financial institution.
(b) As used in this subsection, “financial institution” means a financial institution as defined  in
ORS 706.008, an entity that regularly issues, processes or services credit cards or  any other com-
parable entity that regularly produces financial records.
(12)(a) A defendant who has been arraigned on an information alleging a felony charge that  is
the subject of a grand jury proceeding and who is  represented by an attorney has a right to appear
before the grand jury as a witness  if, prior to the filing of an indictment, the defense attorney serves
upon the district attorney written notice requesting the appearance.  The notice shall include an
electronic mail address at which the defense attorney may be contacted.
(b) A district attorney is not obligated to  inform a defendant that a grand jury proceeding in-
vestigating charges against the defendant is pending, in progress or about to occur.
(c) Upon receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the district
attorney shall provide in writing the date, time and location of the  defendant’s appearance before
the grand jury to the defense attorney at the indicated electronic mail address. In the event of a
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 6
scheduling conflict, the district attorney shall reasonably accommodate the schedules of  the de-
fendant and the defense attorney if  the accommodation does not delay the grand jury proceeding
beyond the time limit for holding a preliminary hearing described in ORS 135.070 (2).
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 135.070 and paragraph (c) of this subsection, in  order to accommodate
a scheduling conflict, upon the request  of the defendant the time limit for holding a preliminary
hearing described  in ORS 135.070 (2) may be extended by a maximum of an additional five judicial
days and the district  attorney and the defendant may stipulate to an extension of greater duration.
During a period of delay caused by a scheduling conflict under  this subsection, ORS 135.230 to
135.290 shall continue to apply concerning the custody status of the defendant.
(13) A grand  jury in a judicial district with a population between 150,000 and 300,000 or
over 700,000, the proceedings of which are recorded pursuant to sections 1 and  2 of this 2017
Act, may receive in evidence, through the testimony of a peace officer involved in the crim-
inal investigation under grand jury inquiry, the statement of:
(a) A person who cannot readily understand the proceedings, or who cannot communicate
in the proceedings, because of a physical disability or developmental disability; or
(b) A victim under 18 years of age at the time of the proceedings.
SECTION 6.
 ORS 132.430 is amended to read:
132.430. (1) When a person  has been held to answer a criminal charge and the indictment in
relation thereto is not found “a true bill,” [ it] the indictment  must be indorsed “not a true bill,”
which indorsement must be signed  by the foreman and filed with the clerk of the court, in whose
office it shall remain a public record. In  the case of an indictment not found “a true bill” against
a person [ not so held, the same, together with the minutes of the evidence in relation thereto, ] who has
not been held to answer a criminal charge, the indictment  must be destroyed  by the grand jury.
(2) When an indictment  indorsed “not a true bill” has been filed with the clerk of the court, the
effect [ thereof] is to  dismiss the charge[ ;], and the [ same] charge  cannot be again submitted to or
inquired of by the grand jury unless the court so orders.
SECTION 7.  ORS 132.550 is amended to read:
132.550. The indictment shall contain substantially the following:
(1) The name of the circuit court in which it is filed;
(2) The title of the action;
(3) A statement that the grand jury accuses the defendant or defendants of the designated  of-
fense or offenses;
(4) A separate accusation or count addressed  to each offense charged, if there be more than one;
(5) A statement in each count that the offense charged therein was committed in  a designated
county;
(6) A statement in each count that the offense charged therein was committed on, or on  or
about, a designated date, or during a designated period of time;
(7) A statement of the acts constituting  the offense in ordinary and concise language, without
repetition, and in such manner as to enable a person of common understanding to know what is
intended;
(8) The dates of all grand jury proceedings related to the offense or offenses charged;
[(8)] (9) The signatures of the foreman and of the district attorney; and
[(9)] (10) The date the indictment is filed with the clerk of the court.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 135.405 is amended to read:
135.405. (1) In cases in which it appears that the interest of the public in the effective  adminis-
tration of criminal justice would thereby be served, and in  accordance with the criteria set forth in
ORS 135.415, the district attorney may engage in plea discussions for the purpose of  reaching a plea
agreement.
(2) The district attorney shall engage  in plea discussions or reach a plea agreement with the
defendant only through defense counsel, except when, as a  matter of record, the defendant has ef-
fectively waived the right of the defendant to  counsel or, if the defendant is not eligible for ap-
pointed counsel, has not retained counsel.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 7
(3) The district  attorney in reaching a plea agreement may agree to, but is not limited to, one
or more of the following, as required by the circumstances of the individual case:
(a) To make or not to oppose  favorable recommendations as to the sentence which should be
imposed if the defendant enters a plea of guilty or no contest to the offense charged;
(b) To seek or not to oppose dismissal of the offense charged if the defendant enters a  plea of
guilty or no contest to another offense reasonably related to the defendant’s conduct; or
(c) To seek or not to oppose dismissal of other charges or to refrain from  bringing potential
charges if the defendant enters a plea of guilty or no contest to the offense charged.
(4) Similarly situated defendants should be afforded equal plea agreement opportunities.
(5) The district attorney may not condition a plea offer on a requirement that the  defendant
waive :
(a) The disclosure obligation of ORS 135.815 (1)(g)[ .]; or
(b) The ability to receive the audio recording of grand jury proceedings as permitted un-
der section 3 of this 2017 Act, if the indictment has been indorsed “a true bill.”
(6)(a) A district attorney may provide a plea offer and agreed disposition  recommendation to the
defendant at the time of arraignment or first appearance of  the defendant for a crime in open court
under an early disposition program established under ORS 135.941.
(b) Unless extended by  the court, a plea offer and agreed disposition recommendation made un-
der paragraph (a) of this subsection expire upon completion of the  arraignment. Except for good
cause, a court  may not extend a plea offer and agreed disposition recommendation under this para-
graph for more than seven days for a misdemeanor or 21 days for a felony.
SECTION 9.
 Section 1 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 1.  (1)(a) The district attorney of a county [ comprising a judicial  district with a population
between 150,000 and  300,000 or over 700,000 ] shall ensure that proceedings before the grand jury are
recorded in the manner described in this section and section 2 of this 2017 Act.
(b) The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall designate the types  of audio electronic re-
cording devices suitable for recording grand jury proceedings and may  establish policies and pro-
cedures by rule or order to carry out the provisions of this section and sections 2 and 3  of this 2017
Act.
(c) The district attorney shall use to record the grand jury proceedings audio electronic re-
cording devices designated, provided and maintained by the Judicial Department.
(2)(a) The district attorney shall delegate the  recording of grand jury proceedings to a grand
juror and shall provide instruction to the grand juror concerning the  audio electronic recording
equipment and requirements of the recording.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  court may, upon request of the prose-
cuting attorney, appoint a certified shorthand reporter  as defined in ORS 8.415 or a shorthand re-
porter certified by a national certification association, who  shall be permitted to attend all
proceedings of the grand jury for the purpose of taking accurate  notes. The shorthand reporter’s
services shall be paid for by the prosecuting attorney. The shorthand reporter shall be sworn to
correctly report the proceedings of the grand jury  described in section 2 of this 2017 Act and to
keep secret any information concerning the grand jury proceedings.
(c) The grand juror or shorthand reporter  recording the proceedings is not subject to subpoena,
and may not disclose any information, concerning the grand jury  proceedings without prior court
order.
(3)(a) A failure of an audio electronic  recording device to accurately record all or part of a
grand jury proceeding does not affect the validity of any prosecution or indictment.
(b) A failure of a grand juror to operate an audio electronic recording device in a  manner that
accurately records all or part of  a grand jury proceeding, as required, does not affect the validity
of any prosecution or indictment.
(c) A failure of  a shorthand reporter to prepare accurate notes or an accurate report of all or
part of a grand jury proceeding, as required,  does not affect the validity of any prosecution or
indictment.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 8
(4) This section and section 2 of this 2017  Act do not apply to grand jury proceedings under
ORS 132.440 that inquire into the condition and  management of correctional facilities and youth
correction facilities.
SECTION 10.  Section 2 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) Except as provided in  subsection (2) of this section, the grand juror described in
section 1 (2)(a) of this 2017 Act, or the shorthand reporter described in section 1  (2)(b) of this 2017
Act, who is recording grand jury proceedings [ in a judicial district with a population  between 150,000
and 300,000 or over 700,000 ] shall record all testimony given before the grand jury, including:
(a) The case name and number;
(b) The name of each witness appearing before the grand jury; and
(c) Each question asked of, and each response  provided by, a witness appearing before the grand
jury.
(2) The grand juror operating the audio electronic recording device  or the shorthand reporter
may not record:
(a) The deliberations or voting of the grand jury.
(b) A presentment made pursuant to ORS 132.370.
(c) Any statements made by a grand juror who is  examined as a witness as provided in ORS
132.350.
(d) A procedure  related to the production of records, or the unsealing of records, subpoenaed
pursuant to ORS 136.583 and to be presented before the grand jury.
(3) The district attorney  shall maintain the audio recordings, or report of the shorthand repor-
ter, produced pursuant to this section and section 1 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 11.
 Section 3 of this 2017 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  (1) Audio recordings and the notes or report  of a shorthand reporter produced pursuant
to sections 1 and 2 of this  2017 Act [ in a judicial district with a population between 150,000 and
300,000 or over 700,000 ] are confidential and may not be released except  as described in this section.
(2) When an  indictment resulting from grand jury proceedings is indorsed “a true bill,” the audio
recording or the notes or report of a shorthand reporter of the grand jury proceedings may be  re-
leased only in the following manner:
(a) The prosecuting attorney may access a copy of the  audio recording or the notes or report
of a shorthand reporter at any time.
(b) When the defendant has been arraigned on the indictment and is  represented by an attorney,
the district attorney shall:
(A) Provide a copy to the defense attorney of all audio recordings, or the notes or report of a
shorthand reporter,  related to an indictment after 10 days have passed since the defendant’s
arraignment on the indictment and no motion described in subsection (4) of this section  has been
filed; or
(B) Provide a copy of the audio recordings, or the notes  or report of a shorthand reporter, to
the defense attorney  in accordance with the court’s ruling on the motion described in subsection (4)
of this section, if a motion has been filed.
(c) Unless the court orders otherwise  for good cause shown, the prosecuting attorney and the
defense attorney may not copy, disseminate or republish the  audio recording, the notes or report
of a shorthand reporter, or a transcript prepared from the audio recording, notes or  report, released
pursuant to this subsection,  except to provide a copy to an agent of the prosecuting attorney or
defense attorney for the limited purpose of  case preparation. Unless a court orders otherwise for
good cause shown, in consulting with the defendant the defense  attorney may not disclose to the
defendant:
(A) Any  personal identifiers of a victim, witness or grand juror obtained from the audio re-
cording, report, notes or transcript; or
(B) Any portion  of the audio recording, report, notes or transcript that contains any personal
identifiers of a victim, witness or grand juror.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 9
(d) The defense attorney may not provide a copy  of the audio recording, notes or report, or a
transcript prepared from the audio recording, notes or report, to the defendant.
(e) When the defendant  has been arraigned but is not represented by an attorney, the defendant
may request by motion that the court issue an order allowing the defendant access to  review the
contents of the audio recording or the notes or report  of the shorthand reporter. A copy of the
motion must  be provided to the prosecuting attorney. The prosecuting attorney may request a
hearing on the motion within 10 days after receiving a copy. At the hearing, or in response to  re-
ceiving the motion, the court shall appoint counsel for the defendant for the  limited purpose of re-
viewing the audio recording, notes or report and may set reasonable conditions on  the review of the
audio recording, notes or report.
(3)(a) When a grand jury inquires into the conduct of a public servant as  defined in ORS 162.005
for acts occurring in the performance of the public servant’s  duties, and an indictment resulting
from the grand jury proceedings is indorsed “not a true bill”:
(A) The public servant or the prosecuting attorney may file a motion requesting a court order
releasing all or a portion of a transcript of the grand  jury proceedings. A copy of the motion must
be served on the opposing party. In  deciding whether to issue such an order, the court shall deter-
mine whether the public interest in disclosure outweighs the interest in  maintaining the secrecy of
the grand jury proceedings. If the court orders disclosure, the  court may set reasonable conditions
on copying, disseminating or republishing the transcript.
(B) A member of the public may file a  motion requesting a court order for production and re-
lease of a transcript of the grand jury proceedings. A copy of the motion  must be served on the
prosecuting attorney and the public servant’s  attorney, or the public servant if the public servant
is not represented by  an attorney. The person filing the motion is responsible for the cost of
producing the transcript and a court  order for production and release of the transcript must be
conditioned on receipt of payment.  In deciding whether to issue such an order, the court shall de-
termine whether the public interest in disclosure outweighs the interest in maintaining  the secrecy
of the grand  jury proceedings. If the court orders disclosure, the court may set reasonable condi-
tions on copying, disseminating or republishing the transcript.
(b) The release of any transcript under this subsection may not include:
(A) The release of any personal identifiers of a victim or witness; or
(B) The release of the name or any personal identifiers of a grand juror.
(4)(a) A motion for a protective order concerning an audio  recording, the notes or report of a
shorthand reporter or a transcript of grand jury proceedings may be filed as follows:
(A) The prosecuting attorney may file a motion for a protective order within  10 days after the
defendant’s arraignment on the indictment. The motion may be filed on behalf  of a victim or a wit-
ness. The prosecuting attorney shall inform the victim of the ability to seek a protective order.
(B) The prosecuting attorney may file a  motion for a protective order within 10 days after re-
ceiving a motion described in subsection (2)(e) of this section.
(C) The  prosecuting attorney, the public servant who is the subject of an indictment indorsed
“not a true bill” or the public servant’s attorney may file a motion for a  protective order within 10
days of receiving a motion described in subsection (3)(a) of this section.
(b) If the motion for a protective  order requests that a portion of the audio recording, notes,
report or transcript be redacted, the motion must  be accompanied by a specific description, includ-
ing the date and time, of the portion of  the audio recording, notes, report or transcript to be
redacted.
(c) In response to a motion filed under this subsection, the court may order that the access of
the person requesting release to a copy of the audio  recording, notes, report or transcript be denied,
restricted or deferred, or may make any other  order, upon a finding of substantial and compelling
circumstances.  In  deciding whether to grant the motion and enter a protective order under this
paragraph, the court may consider the following:
(A) Protection of witnesses and others from physical harm, threats of  harm, bribes, economic
interference, reprisal and other forms of intimidation;
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 10
(B) Maintenance of  secrecy regarding informants, as required for effective investigation of
criminal activity;
(C) Confidential information recognized under law,  including the protection of confidential re-
lationships and privileges and the  contents of confidential records unrelated to a crime alleged in
the indictment; and
(D) Any other relevant considerations.
(d) The court may permit  the evidence of substantial and compelling circumstances described in
paragraph (c) of this subsection to be made in the  form of a written statement to be inspected by
the court only or by oral testimony given on the record.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, when grand jury  proceedings do
not result in an indictment indorsed as either “a true bill” or “not a  true bill,” the audio recording
or notes or report of the shorthand reporter produced pursuant  to sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act
may not be disclosed or released.
(b) When subsequent grand jury proceedings occur inquiring into the same criminal  episode as
the grand jury proceedings described in paragraph (a) of this subsection,  and the subsequent pro-
ceedings result in an indictment indorsed as “a true bill,” the prosecuting  attorney shall provide
notice to the person charged in the indictment of the occurrence of the earlier grand  jury pro-
ceedings.  After  the person is arraigned on the indictment and the time period described in sub-
section (2)(b) of this section has passed,  the audio recording or the notes or report of the shorthand
reporter produced during the earlier grand jury proceedings may be obtained in the manner set forth
in subsection (2) of this section.
(c) As used in  this subsection, “criminal episode” has the meaning given that term in ORS
131.505.
(6) The district attorney of each county may  establish a fee for the cost of providing a copy of
any audio recording,  or the notes or report of a shorthand reporter, of a grand jury proceeding to
a person requesting a copy under this section.
(7) An audio recording, the notes  or report of a shorthand reporter or a transcript of a grand
jury proceeding obtained pursuant to sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act and this section:
(a) May not be used as evidence in any subsequent proceeding, except  as permitted under ORS
40.375, 40.380, 40.450, 40.460 or 40.465.
(b) May not be used to challenge  the indorsement of an indictment “a true bill” or the pro-
ceedings that led to the indorsement.
(c) May be used as evidence in a prosecution for perjury or false swearing committed  by a
witness while giving testimony during the grand jury proceeding or during trial.
(d) May be used as evidence in a proceeding for contempt of  court against a person alleged to
have violated the terms of a court order concerning the audio recording, notes, report or  transcript.
(e) May be submitted to the court and used as evidence for a hearing on a  protective order
described in subsection (4) of this section.
(8) The release of audio recordings, shorthand reporter notes or reports or transcripts of grand
jury proceedings under this section does  not affect discovery obligations under ORS 135.805 to
135.873.
(9) As used in this section:
(a) “Personal identifiers” means:
(A) In relation to a witness or a grand juror, the person’s address,  telephone number, driver li-
cense, vehicle registration information, Social Security number, date of birth and the  identifying
number of the person’s depository account at a financial institution, as defined  in ORS 706.008, or
credit card account.
(B) In relation to a victim, the victim’s address, electronic mail address, telephone number,
driver license, vehicle  registration information, Social Security number, date of birth, any user
names or other identifying information associated with the victim’s social  media accounts and the
identifying number of  the victim’s depository account at a financial institution, as defined in ORS
706.008, or credit card account.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 11
(b) “Social media” has the meaning given that term in ORS 659A.330.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 132.090, as amended by section 4 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
132.090. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section and sections 1 and 2  of
this 2017 Act, no person other than the district attorney or a  witness actually under examination
shall be present during the sittings of the grand jury.
(2) Upon a motion filed by the district attorney in the circuit court,  the circuit judge may ap-
point [ a reporter who shall attend the sittings of the grand jury to take and report the testimony in
any matters pending before the grand jury,  and may appoint ] a parent, guardian or other appropriate
person 18 years of age or older to accompany any  child 12 years of age or younger, or any person
with an intellectual disability, during  an appearance before the grand jury. The circuit judge, upon
the district attorney’s showing to the court that it is  necessary for the proper examination of a
witness appearing before the grand jury, may appoint a guard, medical or other special  attendant
or nurse, who shall be present in the grand jury room and shall attend such sittings.
(3) The district attorney may  designate an interpreter who is certified under ORS 45.291 to in-
terpret the testimony of witnesses  appearing before the grand jury. The district attorney may des-
ignate a  qualified interpreter, as defined in ORS 45.288, if the circuit court determines that a
certified  interpreter  is not available and that the person designated by the district attorney is a
qualified interpreter as defined in ORS 45.288. An interpreter designated under this subsection may
be present in the grand jury room and attend the sittings of the grand jury.
(4) No person other than members of the grand  jury shall be present when the grand jury is
deliberating or voting upon a matter before it.
(5) As used in this  section, “intellectual disability” has the meaning given that term in ORS
427.005. Intellectual disability may be shown by attaching to the motion of the district attorney:
(a) Documentary evidence of intellectual functioning; or
(b) The affidavit of a qualified person familiar  with the person with an intellectual disability.
“Qualified person” includes, but is not limited to, a teacher, therapist or physician.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 132.320, as amended by section 5 of this 2017 Act, is amended to read:
132.320. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) to (13) of this section, in the investigation  of
a charge for the purpose of indictment, the grand jury shall receive no  other evidence than such
as might be given on the trial of the person charged with the crime in question.
(2) A report  or a copy of a report made by a physicist, chemist, medical examiner, physician,
firearms identification expert, examiner of questioned documents, fingerprint technician,  or an ex-
pert or technician  in some comparable scientific or professional field, concerning the results of an
examination, comparison or test performed by such person in connection  with a case which is the
subject of a grand  jury proceeding, shall, when certified by such person as a report made by such
person or as a true copy thereof, be received in evidence in the grand jury proceeding.
(3) An affidavit of a witness who is unable to appear before the grand jury shall be received  in
evidence in the grand jury proceeding if, upon application by the district attorney, the  presiding
judge for the judicial district in which the grand  jury is sitting authorizes the receipt after good
cause has been shown for the witness’ inability to appear.  An affidavit taken in another state or
territory of the United States, the District of Columbia or in a foreign  country must be
authenticated as provided in ORS chapter 194 before it can be used in this state.
(4) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of criminal driving while suspended or revoked
under ORS 811.182 may receive in evidence  an affidavit of a peace officer with a report or copy of
a report of the peace officer concerning the peace officer’s investigation of the violation of  ORS
811.182 by the defendant.
(5) A grand  jury may receive testimony of a witness by means of simultaneous television trans-
mission allowing the grand jury and district attorney to observe and communicate with  the witness
and the witness to observe and communicate with the grand jury and the district attorney.
(6) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of failure to appear under  ORS 133.076, 153.992,
162.195 or 162.205  may receive in evidence an affidavit of a court employee certifying that the de-
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 12
fendant failed to appear as required by law and setting forth facts  sufficient to support that con-
clusion.
(7)(a) Except as otherwise provided in this  subsection, a grand jury may receive in evidence
through the testimony of one peace officer involved in the criminal investigation under grand jury
inquiry information from an official  report of another peace officer involved in the same criminal
investigation concerning the other peace officer’s investigation of the matter before the grand  jury.
The statement of a person suspected of  committing an offense or inadmissible hearsay of persons
other than the peace officer who  compiled the official report may not be presented to a grand jury
under this paragraph.
(b) If the official report contains evidence other than chain of custody,  venue or the name of the
person suspected of committing an offense, the grand jurors must be notified that the  evidence is
being submitted by report and that the peace officer who compiled the report  will be made available
for testimony  at the request of the grand jury. When a grand jury requests the testimony of a peace
officer under this paragraph, the peace  officer may present sworn testimony by telephone if requir-
ing the peace officer’s presence before the grand jury would constitute an undue hardship  on the
peace officer or the agency that employs or utilizes the peace officer.
(8) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of failure to report as a  sex offender under ORS
163A.040 may receive in evidence certified copies of the  form required by ORS 163A.050 (2) and sex
offender registration forms  and an affidavit of a representative of the Oregon State Police, as
keepers of the state’s  sex offender registration records, certifying that the certified copies of the
forms constitute the complete record for the defendant.
(9) The grand jury shall weigh all the evidence submitted to it; and when it believes that other
evidence within its reach will explain away the charge, it should  order such evidence to be
produced, and for that purpose may require the district attorney to issue process for the  witnesses.
(10) A grand jury that is investigating a charge of driving while  under the influence of
intoxicants in violation of ORS 813.010 may receive in evidence an affidavit of a  peace officer re-
garding any or all of the following:
(a) Whether the defendant was driving.
(b) Whether the defendant took or refused to take tests  under any provision of ORS chapter 813.
(c) The administration of tests under any provision of ORS  chapter 813 and the results of such
tests.
(d) The officer’s observations of physical or mental impairment of the defendant.
(11)(a) A grand jury may receive in evidence an  affidavit of a representative of a financial in-
stitution for the purpose of authenticating records of the financial institution.
(b) As used in this subsection, “financial institution” means a financial institution as defined  in
ORS 706.008, an entity  that regularly issues, processes or services credit cards or any other com-
parable entity that regularly produces financial records.
(12)(a) A  defendant who has been arraigned on an information alleging a felony charge that is
the subject of a grand jury proceeding and who is  represented by an attorney has a right to appear
before the grand jury as a witness  if, prior to the filing of an indictment, the defense attorney serves
upon the district attorney written notice  requesting the appearance. The notice shall include an
electronic mail address at which the defense attorney may be contacted.
(b) A district attorney is not obligated to inform a  defendant that a grand jury proceeding in-
vestigating charges against the defendant is pending, in progress or about to occur.
(c) Upon receipt of the written notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the district
attorney shall provide in  writing the date, time and location of the defendant’s appearance before
the grand jury to the defense attorney at the indicated electronic mail address. In the event of a
scheduling conflict, the  district attorney shall reasonably accommodate the schedules of the de-
fendant and the defense attorney if the accommodation does not  delay the grand jury proceeding
beyond the time limit for holding a preliminary hearing described in ORS 135.070 (2).
(d) Notwithstanding ORS 135.070 and paragraph (c) of this subsection, in  order to accommodate
a scheduling conflict, upon the request of the defendant the time  limit for holding a preliminary
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 13
hearing described in ORS 135.070 (2) may be extended by a maximum of an additional five  judicial
days and the district attorney and the defendant may stipulate to an extension  of greater duration.
During a period of delay caused  by a scheduling conflict under this subsection, ORS 135.230 to
135.290 shall continue to apply concerning the custody status of the defendant.
(13) A grand jury [ in a judicial district with a  population between 150,000 and 300,000 or over
700,000], the proceedings of which are recorded pursuant to  sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act, may
receive in evidence, through the testimony of  a peace officer involved in the criminal investigation
under grand jury inquiry, the statement of:
(a) A person who cannot readily understand the proceedings, or who cannot  communicate in the
proceedings, because of a physical disability or developmental disability; or
(b) A victim under 18 years of age at the time of the proceedings.
SECTION 14.
ORS 132.080 is repealed.
SECTION 15. The Public Defense Services Commission, the Judicial Department and each
county that begins recording grand jury proceedings under sections 1  and 2 of this 2017 Act
on March 1, 2018, shall:
(1) Provide a preliminary report on the implementation of the recording requirement  to
the Emergency Board and the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the
judiciary, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, no later than December 1, 2018.
(2) Provide a final report on  the implementation of the recording requirement to the
Joint Committee on  Ways and Means and the committees of the Legislative Assembly related
to the judiciary, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245, no later than February 1, 2019.
SECTION 16.
In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Judicial Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017,  out of the Gen-
eral Fund, the amount of $1,500,000, for the purchase of equipment and services and for other
expenses necessary to carry out the provisions of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 17. (1) In addition to and not  in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $8,500,000, to be allocated for  expenses necessary to carry out
the provisions of this 2017 Act.
(2) If any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not  allocated
by the Emergency Board prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on  that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 18. (1) Sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act and the amendments to ORS 132.090,
132.320, 132.550 and 135.405 by sections 4, 5, 7 and  8 of this 2017 Act become operative on
March 1, 2018.
(2) The amendments to sections 1, 2 and 3 of this 2017 Act  and ORS 132.090, 132.320 and
132.430 by sections 6, 9, 10, 11, 12 and 13 of this 2017 Act and the repeal of ORS 132.080 by
section 14 of this 2017 Act become operative on July 1, 2019.
(3) The Judicial Department may take any action before the operative  dates specified in
subsections (1) and (2) of this section that  is necessary to enable the department to exercise
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the department by this 2017 Act.
SECTION 19. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 14
Passed by Senate July 4, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 505 (SB 505-B) Page 15